Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB217.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-201x is hereby amended to read as
follows: 79-201x. For taxable year 2024 2025, and all taxable years
thereafter, the following described property, to the extent herein specified,
shall be and is hereby exempt from the property tax levied pursuant to the
provisions of K.S.A. 72-5142, and amendments thereto: Property used for
residential purposes to the extent of $75,000 $125,000 of its appraised
valuation.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-201x is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.